Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 1. In General

§ 20-6-101.
Short title.

This act may be cited as the “Child Support Enforcement Act”.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 51, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-6-102(a)(vii).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Wyo. Workers' Comp. Div. v. Halstead, 795 P.2d 760,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1990); Department of Family Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs. v. DDM, 877 P.2d 259,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 20-6-102.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Noncustodial parent” means the parent who was not awarded primary physical custody of the child by the court;

“Department” means the department of family services;

“Division” means the designated body to administer Title IV-D child support services within the department of family services;

“Obligee” means a person to whom the duty of support is owed;

“Obligor” means any person owing a duty of support;

“Title IV-D” means Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act as amended [42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.];

“This act” means W.S.

20-6-101

through

20-6-112

;

“Support order” means any order entered by a court or a tribal court, which provides for payment for the support of a child and may include medical support, spousal support, arrearages related costs and fees, interest and penalties, income withholding, and other relief;

“IV-D agency” means the department of family services;

“Clerk” means, for the purpose of receipts, distribution and disbursement of child support, the clerk of district court in this state where the obligor is ordered to make payments, or where mandated by law, the state disbursement unit;

“Licensing agency” means the state or any of its political subdivisions, any board, commission or other entity that issues licenses, certificates or permits necessary for an obligor to operate a motor vehicle, hunt, fish or practice a profession or occupation;

“Program” means child support services provided in cooperation with the federal government pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, as amended.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 51, § 1; Laws 1985, ch. 109, § 2; Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 3; Laws 1997, ch. 193, § 2; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2000, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 20-6-103.
Child support enforcement program; administration by child support enforcement section.

The department shall establish a program of child support enforcement services in cooperation with the federal government pursuant to Title IV-D and other applicable federal regulations, to aid in administering the requirements of the program.

The department shall designate a division within the department to administer the program in accordance with this act.

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 179, § 2.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 51, § 1; Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 2000, ch. 53, § 1; 2017 ch. 179, § 2, effective March 6, 2017.

The 2017 amendment,

deleted (c).

Laws 2017, ch. 179, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-6-102(a)(vii).

Evidence of actual income. —

In establishing the amount of back child support owed, a state must determine the actual income of both parents for the time period at issue, or the state must have a factual basis to support that any imputation of income was reasonable over the time periods at issue. Whitt v. State ex rel. Wright, 2001 WY 128, 36 P.3d 617,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2001).

Cited

in

Dep't of Family Servs. v. Peterson, 960 P.2d 1022,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1998).

§ 20-6-104.
Child support enforcement services generally.

The services in intrastate and interstate situations provided under the child support enforcement program subject to or by appropriate orders of the court shall include:

The establishment, enforcement and modification of an obligor’s obligation to support dependent children;

The establishment, enforcement and modification of an obligor’s obligation to provide medical support in all cases and medical insurance coverage for dependent children when available at a reasonable cost;

The location of an obligor or putative parent, obligee or child for purposes of establishing, enforcing or modifying the child support and medical support obligations and enforcing the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act;

The monitoring and processing of an obligor’s child support payments;

Providing applications, information and intake services to all eligible persons pursuant to law or upon request;

The location of persons, upon request of the noncustodial parent, in cases of denial or interference with court ordered visitation or in cases in which the custodial parent has removed the child from the state and failed to give notice of change of address in violation of a court order;

When an obligor is required to provide medical insurance coverage through the employer’s health plan pursuant to a court order, the notification to an employer unless the obligor contests the notification and establishes good cause why the notice should not be provided;

The establishment of paternity for out of wedlock children pursuant to W.S.

14-2-401

et seq.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 51, § 1; Laws 1988, ch. 10, § 1; Laws 1997, ch. 193, § 2; 2000, ch. 53, § 1; 2003, ch. 93, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Dep't of Family Servs. v. Peterson, 960 P.2d 1022,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1998).

“Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act.” —

The federal Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act, referred to in subsection (a)(iii), appears as 28 U.S.C. § 1738A. See also 42 U.S.C. §§ 653 and 663.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What voluntary acts of child, other than marriage or entry into military service, terminate parent's obligation to support, 55 ALR5th 557.

Construction and application of International Child Abduction Remedies Act (42 USC § 11601 et seq.), 125 ALR Fed 217.

§ 20-6-105.
Eligibility for services; fees for services.

Child support enforcement services shall be provided to:

Those recipients of aid under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program who, as a condition of eligibility under federal law, are required to assign their rights to support to, and cooperate with, the department in the establishment of parentage and the establishment, enforcement and modification of support obligations; and

Any eligible obligee or obligor without regard to income or the receipt of public assistance benefits. Eligibility shall be subject to reasonable standards established by the department. These standards shall take into account Title IV-D and other applicable federal regulations and the earnings, income and other resources already available to support the person.

The department may charge the obligee or obligor, a reasonable application fee under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section and W.S. 20-6-108(a) and may recover the fee and all necessary and reasonable expenses of providing services from the obligor or obligee. The department may waive or defer any fee upon a showing of:

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 53, § 2.

Necessity.

The department shall, to comply with federal law, collect an annual fee from the obligee for child support enforcement services provided under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section. The department shall recover the fee from the obligee. The court may assess the fee to the obligor in any child support order.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 51, § 1; Laws 1997, ch. 196, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 1999, ch. 117, § 1; 2000, ch. 53, §§ 1, 2; 2007, ch. 189, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, added (c).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 189, § 2, provides:

“There is appropriated three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000.00), or as much thereof as necessary, from the general fund to the department of family services for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 and ending June 30, 2008, to implement the purposes of this act. No part of this appropriation shall be expended without the prior approval of the chief information officer for any computer and software services and by the governor for all remaining expenditures.”

Construction with UIFSA. —

Subdivision (a)(ii) of this section was not intended to limit services available under Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, and therefore state was authorized to bring child support enforcement action in its own name without regard to residency of obligee. Flores v. Flores, 979 P.2d 944,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 20-6-106.
Powers and duties of department regarding collection of support.

By signing an application for, or being a recipient of, aid under the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program, a support obligee assigns to the department, by operation of law, all rights that person and all other members of the household have to child and spousal support, whether accrued, present or future, and their right to medical support.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 53, § 2.

The department has the power of attorney to act in the name of any recipient of public assistance in endorsing and cashing all drafts, checks, money orders or other negotiable instruments received by the department representing support payments for children on whose behalf public assistance has been previously paid.

For purposes of prosecuting any civil action under this act or other applicable state statutes relating to the enforcement of child support obligations, the department is the assignee of support rights to the extent of any public assistance provided to an obligee. No act of the obligee shall prejudice the rights of the department or the dependent child in any action or proceeding related to enforcement of child support services hereunder.

No agreement between any obligee and any obligor purporting to relieve the obligor of any duty of support or to settle past, present or future support or obligations either as settlement or prepayment will reduce or terminate any rights of the department to recover from the obligor for support provided by the department unless the department has consented to the agreement in writing or unless it has been approved by the court with notice to the department.

The department, in its own name, or on behalf of an obligee, obligor or a child may petition a court for modification of any court order establishing a support obligation.

If a court orders support to be paid by an obligor, the department shall be subrogated to the debt created by the order. This subrogation interest shall apply to all orders of support including child support orders, medical support orders, temporary spouse support orders, family maintenance and alimony orders. The subrogation shall extend to the amounts paid by the department in public assistance to or for the benefit of a dependent child and the amount of medical support provided by or through another division of the department of family services or the department of health.

The department may enforce, or, subject to the approval of the court, may compromise or settle any claim or judgment for a support obligation owed to or assigned to the department as may be in the best interest of the dependent child and the public.

The department may offer each county a cooperative agreement relating to the services to be provided by clerks of district court or child support authorities in child support enforcement cases. The department shall enter into a cooperative agreement with the department of workforce services to recover sums owed under a support order from unemployment benefits awarded to an obligor.

The department may contract with private vendors for services necessary to carry out its responsibilities under Title IV-D, applicable federal regulations, this act and its rules and regulations as they relate to child support enforcement.

The department may:

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 53, § 2.

Seek collection of child, medical and spousal support arrears, through the federal offset program under Title IV-D and all applicable federal regulations;

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 193, § 3.

Request a consumer report from a consumer reporting agency pursuant to section 604 of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681b, provided the individual named in consumer report is associated with a IV-D support case, the report received by the department is kept confidential except to the extent needed to accomplish the purposes of this paragraph and the report is needed to:

Locate the individual’s whereabouts;

Establish the individual’s capacity to pay child support; or

Establish, enforce or modify the appropriate level of child support payments.

In appropriate circumstances, petition the court to order the child, mother or alleged father to submit to genetic tests to establish paternity, or, in the alternative, to require the testing on its own order;

Issue subpoenas for information requested under paragraph (v) of this subsection and impose administrative penalties not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for any person failing to respond;

Require all persons, including government, private for-profit employers and not-for-profit employers and public utility companies to respond to a request by the department for information on social security number, address, employment, compensation and benefits of any individual for any individual who owes or is owed support, or against or with respect to whom a support obligation is sought, and who is employed by the person as an employee or contractor, in accordance with rules adopted by the department. Any person who fails to respond to any request for information may be sanctioned by the department by imposing administrative penalties not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00). The department shall enter the employer information into the state directory of new hires within five (5) business days after receipt of the employer information. The department may issue administrative subpoenas for financial or other information needed to establish, modify or enforce a support order and impose administrative penalties not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for any person failing to respond. The department may administratively subpoena the customer records of public utility companies for the names and addresses of individuals who owe or are owed support, or against or with respect to whom a support obligation is sought. The department shall notify the supervisor of any employee of a governmental agency if the employee fails to respond to a request under this paragraph. Any person who, acting in good faith, provides information to the department under this paragraph shall not be liable for civil damages as a result of the information provided. The department shall deposit any penalties collected under this paragraph in the public school fund of the respective counties;

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 53, § 2.

Issue an income withholding order, if an income withholding order has not previously been issued. The department shall file the order with the clerk of court who shall mail copies of the order as provided by W.S. 20-6-204(c);

Seize assets when an arrearage exists by:

Intercepting or seizing periodic or lump sum payments from a state or local government agency, including unemployment compensation, workers’ compensation and other benefits or judgments, settlements and lottery winnings;

Attaching and, pursuant to a court order, seizing assets owned solely by the obligor that are held in financial institutions or national chartered credit unions;

Attaching public and private retirement funds pursuant to state law; and

Imposing liens and, in appropriate cases, petitioning a court to force the sale of property and distribution of the proceeds.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 53, § 2.

In any case where there exists child support arrearages and for which payments are allowed or required, petition the district court for an increase or decrease in the required payments due on the arrearages;

Petition a court to void fraudulent transfers, or obtain a settlement in the best interests of a child support creditor when a prima facie case is established that the obligor has transferred income or property to avoid payment to the child support creditor;

Appear in any judicial proceeding on behalf of the state when any obligee or obligor makes application for IV-D services, in order to establish, enforce or modify a child support order, medical support order or a spousal support order, if the spousal support issue is considered in conjunction with the child support or medical support issues, provided the department shall not be required to participate in visitation, custody, property settlement or other issues between the parties. The department shall certify that the obligee, obligor or child has applied for or is receiving Title IV-D services. Initial pleadings filed by the department or its contractors shall state that the action is being taken pursuant to this act or Title IV-D;

If an obligee receives child support which has been assigned to the department, recover the child support payments out of current or future child support payments due to the obligee which are unassigned until the assigned sums have been fully paid;

Allocate and distribute child, medical and spousal support whether accrued, present or future pursuant to regulations.

The department shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations to carry out the provision of this act, including rules and regulations governing:

The provision of services pursuant to the program;

The distribution of child support collected by the department;

Due process safeguards;

The administration of child support income;

Requirements for adequate record keeping;

Tracking and monitoring of program statistics and support payments.

If a court, on its own motion or pursuant to a request from the department, orders an able-bodied obligor who is unemployed and otherwise unable to fulfill his court-ordered child support obligation to participate in the personal opportunities with employment responsibilities program administered by the department, the department shall permit the obligor to participate pursuant to the court order without regard to the program eligibility requirements under title 42 or the department rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.

through (r) Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 53, § 2.

The department shall not enforce any administrative procedures contained in this act until it has implemented rules providing due process safeguards, including requirements for notice, opportunity to contest the action and an opportunity to appeal to the district court. Any obligor may recover costs and reasonable attorney fees from the department or its child support collection contractor for costs incurred in any administrative hearing or subsequent court appeal if:

It is found that the obligor did not owe an arrearage and had paid all required support to the clerk.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 53, § 2.

The department of health and the department of family services shall through rules and regulations develop procedures to allow the sharing of birth and paternity records for purposes of establishing paternity and child support obligations.

The department shall, to the extent required by federal law, have access to any information used by the state to locate an individual for purposes relating to motor vehicle laws or law enforcement and enter into agreements with financial institutions, national chartered credit unions, benefit associations, insurance companies, safe deposit companies, money market mutual funds or similar entities authorized to do business in the state as provided in W.S.

13-1-205

to develop and operate an automated data match system to obtain identifying information for each obligor who maintains an account at the institution and who owes past due child support in an amount equal to at least triple the current monthly child support obligation and to allow assets to be encumbered as provided by law.

The department shall report to any consumer reporting agency as defined in section 603(f) of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681a(f) information regarding the amount of overdue support owed by an obligor.

The department shall, to the extent an obligor is resident in the state or owns real or personal property in the state, have a lien by operation of law against that real or personal property. After an obligor is in arrears at least triple the current monthly child support obligation, the department shall perfect and enforce a lien authorized by this section in the same manner as liens are perfected for the specific type of real or personal property upon which the lien is claimed. In the event there are competing liens or encumbrances on any property upon which a lien is attached pursuant to this section, the priority of the competing liens or encumbrances shall date from the date of filing or perfection. The state of Wyoming shall accord full faith and credit to a lien arising in another state as a result of child support arrearages when the other state or an agency thereof seeks to enforce such lien, provided the lien was properly filed and recorded under the laws of the state in which the lien was created.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 53, § 2.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 51, § 1; Laws 1985, ch. 109, § 2; Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 2; Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 3; ch. 221, § 2; Laws 1993, ch. 112, § 1; Laws 1995, ch. 148, § 2; Laws 1997, ch. 128, § 2; ch. 193, §§ 2, 3; ch. 196, § 1; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 1999, ch. 117, § 1; 2000, ch. 53, §§ 1, 2; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “Title IV-D,” see § 20-6-102(a)(vi).

The 2008 amendment,

added “15 U.S.C. 1681a(f)” in (w).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in (j).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i), (l), (v), or (x) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-6-102(a)(vii).

Modification proper.—

District court
properly modified child support because it did not abuse its discretion
in deviating from the presumptive child support amount; once the
district
determined that deviation was appropriate based on the
father’s
obligation to a later-born child from his subsequent
marriage, nothing
prevented it from calculating the appropriate
support obligation
by
considering the presumptive amount for all
of the father’s
children.
TSR v. State ex rel. Dep't of Family Servs., 2017 WY 144, 406 P.3d 729,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2017).

Parties in interest in support award. —

If the obligee of a child or spousal support award is not receiving public assistance, the support award is not assigned to the Department of Family Services, and the Department is not a party of interest in the matter. Department of Family Servs. v. Peterson, 960 P.2d 1022,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1998).

Assignment of support rights. —

This article requires that in exchange for receiving public assistance a custodial parent assigns all rights to support payments, whether past, current, or future; and that Department's right to subrogation from supporting parent begins when support obligation, and not public assistance, begins. Dept. of Family Servs. v. Peterson, 957 P.2d 1307,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1998) decided under prior law.

Public assistance recipients. —

This section authorized the Department of Family Services to bring an action to enforce a child support order pursuant to former § 20-6-306(a) (now see §

20-2-112

), without regard to the obligee's status as a recipient or nonrecipient of public assistance. Department of Family Servs. v. Peterson, 960 P.2d 1022,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 115

(Wyo. 1998).

Stated

in

Department of Family Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs. v. DDM, 877 P.2d 259,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Hollingshead v. Hollingshead, 942 P.2d 1104,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 1997); Stone v. Stone, 7 P.3d 887,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. 2000).

§ 20-6-107.
Payment of support money collected to department.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section the obligor shall make all support payments to the department upon receipt of written notice that the children for whom the support obligation exists are receiving public assistance.

If an obligor is ordered by the court to make payments to the clerk of court, the clerk shall forward all payments received from the obligor to the department.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 51, § 1; Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 2000, ch. 53, § 1.

§ 20-6-108.
State parent locator service.

The department shall act as a state parent locator service to assist in:

The location of parents who have abandoned their children or failed to provide for their support;

The location of persons, upon the request of law enforcement agencies, in cases of parental kidnapping or child custody violations under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act [§§

20-5-201

through

20-5-502

]; and

The location of persons, upon request of the noncustodial parent, in cases of denial or interference with court ordered visitation or in cases in which the custodial parent has removed the child from the state and failed to give notice of change of address in violation of a court order.

The department may request from state, county and local agencies all information and assistance necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. All state, county and city agencies, officers and employees shall cooperate in the location of parents who have violated custody or visitation orders or abandoned, deserted or failed to support their children and shall supply the department with all information available relative to the location, income and property of the parents.

Any records provided, created or established under this section are available only for purposes of this act.

The department shall comply with 42 U.S.C. § 653 with respect to the establishment, purpose and implementation of the federal parent locator service.

The state shall establish and maintain in the federal and state parent locator service, an automated case registry, which shall contain abstracts of support orders and other information as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 653.

The state case registry shall contain the names and social security numbers of the children. The state case registry of child support orders shall include abstracts of support orders, names, social security numbers or other uniform identification numbers and state identification numbers of individuals who owe support, in addition to the names and social security numbers of children of such persons.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 51, § 1; Laws 1988, ch. 10, § 1; Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2000, ch. 53, § 1; 2005, ch. 11, § 2.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(ii), inserted “and Enforcement.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-6-102(a)(vii).

§ 20-6-109.
Cooperation with other states.

When required to qualify for federal funds under Title IV-D, the department shall assist other states in locating parents under the terms and conditions of this act.

Repealed by Laws 2000, ch. 53, § 2.

History.

Laws 1984, ch. 51, § 1; Laws 1991, ch. 161, § 3; 1998, ch. 97, § 2; 2000, ch. 53, §§ 1, 2.

Cross references. —

For meaning of “Title IV-D,” see § 20-6-102(a)(vi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-4-140(a)(xxii).

§ 20-6-110.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 109, § 3; 1986, ch. 18, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1985, ch. 109, § 1, related to the state commission on child support.

§ 20-6-111.
Driver's license suspension; nonpayment of child support; administrative hearings.

When an obligor is in arrears in a court ordered child support obligation, the department or court may:

Determine whether the obligor has a driver’s license, as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxv), that is subject to withholding, suspension or restriction; and

Obtain a court ordered withholding, suspension or restriction of the license unless the obligor pays the entire arrearage or enters into a payment plan approved by the department.

The court, on motion of the department or on its own motion, may direct the department of transportation to withhold, suspend or restrict the license and the department or the court shall send certified copies of the court order to the obligor, at the obligor’s last known address, and to the department of transportation instructing that the department of transportation notify the obligor of the license withholding, suspension or restriction in accordance with the licensing procedures, and that the withholding, suspension or restriction shall remain in effect until the department of transportation is notified by the department or the court that the obligor is in compliance with the court order or has entered into a payment plan approved by the department.

If at any time an obligor has complied with the terms of the court order, or has entered into a payment plan approved by the department, the court or the department, whichever has caused notice to be initially provided, shall immediately notify the department of transportation that the withholding, suspension or restriction may be lifted and the license may be reinstated if the obligor is otherwise eligible for reinstatement.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit subsequent orders and notices for subsequent arrearages if the obligor is again subject to the provisions of this section.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations to ensure notice is provided in an immediate and timely manner to the department of transportation that an obligor is in satisfactory compliance with the court order under this section. Upon receipt of the notice, the department of transportation shall immediately reinstate the license unless the license was suspended or revoked for other reasons. The department of transportation shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations to ensure the license is immediately reinstated upon receipt of the notice.

The department may determine that a driver’s license suspension may be better achieved through an administrative suspension if the obligor owes more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00) in unpaid child support and the obligor has not made a full monthly child support payment either voluntarily or through income withholding for a period of at least ninety (90) consecutive days prior to the determination. The department shall notify the obligor by first class mail or by personal service if notification by first class mail was unsuccessful, that the obligor is in arrears in a child support obligation and that the obligor’s driver’s license as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(xxv) shall be suspended by the department of transportation sixty (60) days after the date the obligor receives the notice unless the obligor:

Pays the entire arrearage owed;

Enters into a payment plan approved by the department; or

Is in full compliance with a court ordered payment plan.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 155, § 2.

Any suspension arising under subsection (f) of this section may be appealed to the district court. The person whose license or driving privilege is affected may file a request for a hearing in the district court in the county where the child support order was issued. The person shall have sixty (60) days from the date of service of the notice of intent to suspend in which to file the request for hearing. A timely request for hearing shall stay imposition of any suspension under subsection (f) of this section. The district court shall immediately set the matter for determination.

Before the license or driving privilege of any person is to be withheld, suspended or restricted under this article, the department shall advise the licensee in the notice required under subsection (f) of this section of his right to appeal to district court for any dispute involving:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 155, § 2.

The amount of current child support owed or arrearage;

The identity of the alleged obligor named in the notice of suspension;

The willfulness of any action or inaction of the obligor that contributed to the nonpayment of child support. As used in this paragraph, “willfulness” means without justifiable excuse.

and (m) Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 155, § 2.

The discretion to modify any order of suspension under this section to allow driving privileges is limited as follows:

A person whose driving privileges have been suspended for nonpayment of child support may be granted limited driving privileges by the district court or the department of transportation for a period not to exceed one hundred twenty (120) days;

A person granted limited driving privileges under this subsection by the district court or the department of transportation shall not be granted an extension of such privileges for twelve (12) months after the limited driving privileges expire unless the person has subsequently made full payment on his child support obligation in arrears, or is in full compliance with a payment plan approved by the department or ordered by a court.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 155, § 2.

After the obligor has paid his child support arrearages in full or has entered into a payment plan with the department, the department shall notify the department of transportation immediately and request the department of transportation to return the driver’s license of that obligor pursuant to this section.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 128, § 1; 2000, ch. 53, § 1; 2009, ch. 155, §§ 1, 2; 2014 ch. 35, § 1, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 113, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “court ordered child support” for “court order child support” in (a); substituted “a court ordered withholding” for “an administrative or court ordered withdrawing” in (a)(ii); deleted the former last two sentences, which read: “The department of transportation shall if requested by the obligor, conduct a record review and advise the court if a probationary or conditional license is appropriate. No hearing or appeal shall be permitted under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act for a license withheld, suspended or restricted pursuant to a court order” in (b); in (f), in the first sentence substituted “The department may determine” for “If the department determines” and added the provisions beginning with
“if the obligor owes”, in the second sentence substituted “shall notify the obligor” for “may notify the department of transportation by electronic data transfer and any obligor”, substituted “if notification by certified mail was unsuccessful” for “or by certified mail, restricted delivery”, and substituted “sixty (60) days after the date the obligor receives the notice” for “ninety (90) days after the date of the notice”; substituted “owed” for “stated in the notice” in (f)(i); added (f)(iii); repealed (g), which dealt with the purview of hearing examiners; in (h), in the first sentence substituted “Any suspension arising under subsection (f)” for “Any order arising out of a hearing under subsection (g)”, in the second sentence substituted “request for a hearing” for “petition for a review of the record” and deleted “person resides or in the case of a nonresident in Laramie county or the county where the” preceding “child support order”, in the third sentence substituted “sixty (60) days from the date of service of the notice of intent to suspend” for “thirty (30) days from the date of the written order” and substituted “request for review” for “petition for review”, added the fourth sentence, and in the last sentence deleted “upon thirty (30) days written notice to the department” from the end; added “of his right to appeal to district court for any dispute involving” to the end of (j); repealed (j)(i) through (j)(iii), which enumerated items of which persons whose driver’s licenses are suspended or restricted should be informed; added (j)(iv) through (j)(vi); repealed (k), which dealt with time limits and procedures for hearings pursuant to notices of license suspensions or restrictions; repealed (m), which read: “Upon receipt of a timely request, the department shall conduct a review of its records and issue an order affirming, modifying or rescinding its notice to suspend the license of the obligor”; inserted “by the district court or the department of transportation” following “driving privileges” in (n)(i); in (n)(ii), inserted “by the district court or the department of transportation” preceding “shall not be granted” and added “or ordered by a court” at the end; repealed (n)(iii), which read: “The department shall notify the department of transportation by electronic data transfer that the person may be granted limited driving privileges as provided in this paragraph”; and added (o).

The 2014 amendment,

in (f)(intro), inserted “full monthly” preceding “child support” in the first sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (f), substituted “two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00)” for “five thousand dollars ($5,000.00” in the first sentence, and substituted “first class mail or by personal service if notification by first class
mail” for “certified mail, with return receipt requested, or by personal service if notification by certified mail” in the second sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).